apertium-niv.niv.twoc
Alphabet
%[Noun%]:0
%[Verb%]:0

 %<v%>
;

Sets

Verb = %<v%> ;

Rules
"Nouns"
%[Noun%]:0 /<=
       _ (:*) %[Noun%]:0 (:*) %[Noun%]:0 ;
       _ (:*) %[Verb%]:0 (:*) %[Noun%]:0 (:*) %[Verb%]:0 ;


 "Verb"
 %[Verb%]:0 /<=
        _ (:*) %[Verb%]:0 (:*) %[Verb%]:0 (:*) %[Verb%]:0 ;
        !_ (:* - %[Noun%]:0) %[Verb%]:0 ;
